Utah statutes.
53A-17a-145.   Additional levy by district for debt service, school sites,
buildings, buses, textbooks, and supplies.
(1)  A school district may elect to increase its tax rate by up to 10% of the
cost of the basic program.
(2)  The proceeds from the increase may only be used for debt service, the
construction or remodeling of school buildings, or the purchase of school
sites, buses, equipment, textbooks, and supplies.
(3)  This section does not prohibit a district from exercising the authority
granted by other laws relating to tax rates.
(4)  This increase in the tax rate is not included in determining the
apportionment of the State School Fund, and is in addition to other tax rates
authorized by law.
